Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.015

Charge by information or indictment—Exceptions.

(1) No person shall be held to answer in any court for an alleged crime or offense, unless upon an information filed by the prosecuting attorney, or upon an indictment by a grand jury, except in cases of misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor before a district or municipal judge, or before a court martial, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Violations of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) may be required by the prosecuting attorney to be referred to his or her office for consideration of filing an information or for entry into a precharge diversion program.

[ 2011 c 46 s 1; 1987 c 202 s 167; 1927 c 103 s 1; Code 1881 s 764; RRS s 2023. Formerly RCW 10.37.010, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.